Idaho, session 2025, H0196.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 36, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 36-308, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
36-308. MULE DEER DOE HUNT MORATORIUM. (1) Due to reduced population,
low survival rates, and reduced success rates of hunters there shall be a
five (5) year moratorium, commencing on July 1, 2025, on all mule deer doe
hunts within the following game management units: 19, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43,
44, 45, 46, 47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 52, 52A, 53, 54, 55, 56, and 57.
(2) The commission may permit hunting within a unit that has a morato-
rium if chronic wasting disease is found within the unit.
SECTION 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall be null, void,
and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2030.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.